Massachusetts, session 194th, S2138.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12 of chapter 156C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (d) and inserting in place thereof
the following:-
(d) The fee for filing of the certificate of organization required by subsection (a) shall be
two hundred and fifty dollars. The fee for the filing of the annual report required by subsection
(c) shall be two hundred and fifty dollars. Such fees shall be paid to the state secretary at the time
the certificate of organization or the annual report is filed.
SECTION 2. This act shall be effective beginning January 1, 2026.
of 1